Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-407
Gross proceeds, defined.

Gross proceeds shall mean the total receipts received from the conduct of the lottery or raffle without any reduction for prizes, discounts, taxes, or allowable expenses. Gross proceeds shall include receipts from any required admission costs or any other required purchase, to the extent such admission cost or purchase itself constitutes a chance in the lottery or raffle, and the value of any free tickets or stubs or free plays used.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 128;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 97.